Massachusetts, session 194th, S935.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 16 of Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
No state scholarship funds under this section, any other section of this chapter, or other
state student financial aid however provided, shall be made available to, or on behalf, of any
student enrolled in any postsecondary educational institution which the board of Higher
Education determines does not meet the requirements of this paragraph. To meet the
requirements of this paragraph, a postsecondary educational institution shall demonstrate to the
board that it has: (i) graduation rates of not less than 30 per cent for undergraduate students
taking 150 per cent or less of the expected time to complete degree requirements, as most
of 2

recently reported by the U.S. Department of Higher Education, provided, that graduation rates
shall include students who transfer; or (ii) an average 3 year cohort default rate that is not more
than 20 per cent, as most recently reported by the U.S. Department of Education. The board of
Higher Education shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this paragraph including,
but not limited to, procedures and processes for annually determining which postsecondary
educational institutions meet the requirements of this paragraph, and a process for an institution
to appeal a determination that they do not meet the necessary requirements. The board of higher
education shall annually post a list of institutions that meet the requirements of this paragraph on
the Department of Higher Education’s website.
of 2